Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.36.080

Local measures—Ballot title—Notice.

Upon the filing of a ballot title of a question to be submitted to the people of a county or municipality, the county auditor shall provide notice of the exact language of the ballot title to the persons proposing the measure, the county or municipality, and to any other person requesting a copy of the ballot title.

[ 2003 c 111 s 908. Prior: 2000 c 197 s 13. Formerly RCW 29.27.0665.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2000 c 197: See note following RCW 29A.72.050.